Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5429
Violation; penalty.

If, after the hearing, the director finds a utilization review agent has violated the Utilization Review Act, the director shall reduce his or her findings to writing and shall issue and cause to be served upon the utilization review agent charged with the violation a copy of the findings and an order requiring the utilization review agent to cease and desist from engaging in the violation and the director may order any one or more of the following:

(1) Payment of a monetary penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of thirty thousand dollars, unless the violation was committed flagrantly and in conscious disregard of the Utilization Review Act, in which case the penalty shall not be more than fifteen thousand dollars for each violation, not to exceed an aggregate penalty of one hundred fifty thousand dollars; and

(2) Suspension or revocation of the utilization review agent's license to do business in this state if the utilization review agent knew or reasonably should have known it was in violation of the act.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 14.